ces-rus_present/apertium/apertium-ces/apertium-ces.ces.dix
    <pardef n="BASE__jsa">  
    <!-- fmorph t1n --><e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ouc</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ouc</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ouce</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ouce</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ouce</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="BASE__plavajíce">  
    <!-- fmorph t3n --><e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>íc</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>íc</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>íce</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>íce</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>íce</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="BASE__vidíce">  
    <!-- fmorph t4n --><e><p><l>ě</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ě</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>íc</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>íc</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>íce</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>íce</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>íce</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="BASE__čtě">
      <e><p><l>tě</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tě</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tíc</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tíc</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tíce</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tíce</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tíce</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="BASE__měv">  
    <!-- fmorph md --><e><p><l></l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ši</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ši</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>še</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>še</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>še</l><r><s n="tgv"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="BASE__mám">
      <e><p><l>ám</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>áš</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>á</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>áme</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>áte</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ájí</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ají</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="BASE__pohostím">  
    <!-- fmorph itxd --><e><p><l>il</l><r><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__četl"/></e>
      <e><p><l>iv</l><r></r></p><par n="BASE__měv"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="BASE__udržím"/></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="BASE__blázním">  
    <!-- fmorph itxn --><e><p><l>il</l><r><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__četl"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__udržím"/></e>
    </pardef>
       
    <pardef n="/být__vbser">
      <e><p><l>být</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jsem</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jseš</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jsi</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jsme</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jste</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jsou</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>budu</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>budeš</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bude</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>budeme</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>budete</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>budou</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>byl</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__četl"/></e>
      <e><p><l>jsouc</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__další"/></e>
      <e><p><l>buď</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/></r></p><par n="BASE__udrž"/></e>
      <e><p><l>js</l><r>být<s n="vbser"/></r></p><par n="BASE__jsa"/></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="m/ít__vbhaver">
      <e><p><l>ít</l><r>ít<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ít<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="BASE__mám"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ěl</l><r>ít<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="BASE__četl"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ěv</l><r>ít<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="impf"/></r></p><par n="BASE__měv"/></e>
      <e><p><l>aje</l><r>ít<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aje</l><r>ít<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajíc</l><r>ít<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajíc</l><r>ít<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajíce</l><r>ít<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajíce</l><r>ít<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajíce</l><r>ít<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="impf"/><s n="tgv"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajíc</l><r>ít<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__další"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ěj</l><r>ít<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="impf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ějme</l><r>ít<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="impf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ějte</l><r>ít<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="impf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

<e lm="být"><par n="v_neg"/><i></i><par n="/být__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="mít"><par n="v_neg"/><i>m</i><par n="m/ít__vbhaver"/></e>
